Utah statutes.
78B-11-123.   Confirmation of award.

After a party to an arbitration proceeding receives notice of an award in a matter not pending before a court, the party may petition the court for an order confirming the award.  If the notice of award is in a matter pending before the court, the party may file a motion for an order confirming the award.  The court shall issue a confirming order unless the award is modified or corrected pursuant to Section 78B-11-121 or 78B-11-125 or is vacated pursuant to Section 78B-11-124.

